New York, session 2025-2026, S4638.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Legislative findings. The legislature finds that the enact- 2 ment of chapter 18 of the laws of 2012 has caused severe employment 3 recruitment and retention shortages throughout the New York state and 4 local public workforce. These shortages have caused massive reductions 5 in the size of the public workforce, significant increases in overtime 6 costs, and unacceptable delays to the citizens of the state. 7 Further, New York state and local governments also face a coming wave 8 of retirements, with over one-quarter of the current workforce eligible 9 to retire in the next five years. These retirements will further exacer- 10 bate worker shortages and overtime costs to unsustainable levels. 11 It is incumbent on the state to proactively address these near-term 12 workforce management challenges to maintain acceptable levels of govern- 13 ment service delivery to all New York state residents. 14 § 2. Temporary state commission to reform tier V and tier VI status in 15 the New York state and local employees' retirement system. 1. A tempo- 16 rary state commission is hereby created to reform and improve tier V and 17 tier VI status in the New York state and local employees' retirement 18 system. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08929-02-6 S. 4638--A 2 1 2. The commission shall consist of nine members, to be appointed as 2 follows: five shall be appointed by the governor; one shall be appointed 3 by the temporary president of the senate; one shall be appointed by the 4 minority leader of the senate; one shall be appointed by the speaker of 5 the assembly; and one shall be appointed by the minority leader of the 6 assembly. 7 3. The commission may employ and at pleasure remove such personnel as 8 it may deem necessary for the performance of its functions and fix their 9 compensation within the amounts made available therefor. 10 4. The commission may meet within and without the state, shall hold at 11 least three public hearings, and shall have all the powers of a legisla- 12 tive committee pursuant to the legislative law. 13 5. The members of the commission shall receive no compensation for 14 their services, but shall be allowed their actual and necessary expenses 15 incurred in the performance of their duties hereunder. 16 6. To the maximum extent feasible, the commission shall be entitled to 17 request and receive and shall utilize and be provided with such facili- 18 ties, resources, and data of any court, department, division, board, 19 bureau, commission, or agency of the state or any political subdivision 20 thereof as it may reasonably request to properly carry out its powers 21 and duties hereunder. 22 7. No later than one year after the effective date of this act, the 23 commission shall submit a final report to the governor, the temporary 24 president of the senate, and the speaker of the assembly containing its 25 findings, conclusions, and recommendations for reforming and improving 26 tier V and tier VI status in the New York state and local employees' 27 retirement system. 28 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 29 deemed repealed 1 year after such date.